District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.203

Certain representations prohibited.

Unless licensed in accordance with this subchapter, no person shall use the words or terms “air conditioning mechanic,” “refrigeration mechanic,” “licensed air conditioning mechanic,” “licensed refrigeration mechanic,” “master mechanic,” or any combination of those words to imply that the person is licensed to perform the services of a refrigeration and air conditioning mechanic in the District.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.203.